nb: Perletråd fibertype: Bomull; Elastan/spandex (stretch); Kevlar/aramid; Lin; Metallisk; Nylon; Polyester; Silke; UHMWPE (PE/Dyneema/Spectra); Annet
lt-LT: Siūlų, skirtų karoliukų vėrimui, pluošto tipas: Medvilnė; Elastanas / spandeksas (tamprus); Kevlaras / aramidas; Linas; Metalizuotas; Nailonas; Poliesteris; Šilkas; UHMWPE (PE / „Dyneema“ / „Spectra“); Kita
bg-BG: Вид влакно на нишката за работа с мъниста: Памук; Еластан/спандекс (разтеглив); Кевлар/арамид; Лен; Металик; Найлон; Полиестер; Коприна; UHMWPE (PE/Dyneema/Spectra); Друго
it: Tipo di fibra thread per perline: Cotone; Elastan/Spandex (elasticizzato); Kevlar/Aramide; Lino; Metallico; Nylon; Poliestere; Seta; UHMWPE (PE/Dyneema/Spectra); Altro
sl-SI: Vrsta vlakna za nit perlic: Bombaž; Elastan/spandeks (raztegljivo); Kevlar/aramid; Lan; Kovinsko; Najlon; Poliester; Svila; UHMWPE (PE/Dyneema/Spectra); Drugo
hr-HR: Vrsta vlakna konca za perle: Pamuk; Elastan / spandeks (rastezljivo); Kevlar/aramid; Lan; Metalik; Najlon; Poliester; Svila; UHMWPE (PE/Dyneema/Spectra); Ostalo
pl: Typ włókna nici do koralików: Bawełna; Elastan / spandex (stretch); Kevlar / aramid; Len; Metalizowane; Nylon; Poliester; Jedwab; UHMWPE (PE / Dyneema / Spectra); Inne
de: Perlenfaden-Fasertyp: Baumwolle; Elasthan/Spandex (Stretch); Kevlar/Aramid; Leinen; Metallic; Nylon; Polyester; Seide; UHMWPE (PE/Dyneema/Spectra); Sonstige
sk-SK: Typ vlákna na navliekanie korálok: Bavlna; Elastan/spandex (streč); Kevlar/aramid; Ľan; Metalické; Nylón; Polyester; Hodváb; UHMWPE (PE/Dyneema/Spectra); Iné
es: Tipo de fibra del hilo para tejido con cuentas: Algodón; Elastano/spandex (elástico); Kevlar/aramida; Lino; Metálico; Nailon; Poliéster; Seda; UHMWPE (PE/Dyneema/Spectra); Otro
sv: Pärltrådens fibertyp: Bomull; Elastan/spandex (stretch); Kevlar/aramid; Linne; Metall; Nylon; Polyester; Silke; UHMWPE (PE/Dyneema/Spectra); Övrigt
ko: 비즈 공예용 실 섬유 유형: 면; 엘라스테인/스판덱스(신축성); 케블라/아라미드; 리넨; 메탈릭; 나일론; 폴리에스터; 실크; UHMWPE(PE/다이니마/스펙트라); 기타
vi: Loại sợi chỉ đính hạt: Cotton; Elastane/Spandex (co giãn); Kevlar/Aramid; Lanh; Sợi kim loại; Nylon; Polyester; Lụa; UHMWPE (PE/Dyneema/Spectra); Khác
fr: Type de fibre du fil de perlage: Coton; Élasthanne/Spandex (extensible); Kevlar/Aramide; Lin; Métallique; Nylon; Polyester; Soie; UHMWPE (PE/Dyneema/Spectra); Autre
hu: Gyöngyfűzési szál száltípusa: Pamut; Elasztán/Spandex (sztreccs); Kevlár/Aramid; Len; Fémes; Nejlon; Poliészter; Selyem; UHMWPE (PE/Dyneema/Spectra); Egyéb
fi: Helmilangan kuitumateriaali: Puuvilla; Elastaani / spandex (joustava); Kevlar / aramidi; Pellava; Metalli; Nailon; Polyesteri; Silkki; UHMWPE (PE / Dyneema / Spectra); Muu
ja: ビーディングスレッドファイバータイプ: コットン; エラスタン/スパンデックス (ストレッチ); ケブラー/アラミド; リネン; メタリック; ナイロン; ポリエステル; シルク; UHMWPE (PE/ダイニーマ/スペクトラ); その他
ru: Тип волокна нити для бисероплетения: Хлопок; Эластан / спандекс (стрейч); Кевлар / арамид; Лён; Металлик; Нейлон; Полиэстер; Шёлк; СВМПЭ (ПЭ / Dyneema / Spectra); Другое
ro-RO: Tip de fibră pentru firul de broderie: Bumbac; Elastan/Spandex (elastic); Kevlar/Aramid; In; Metalic; Nailon; Poliester; Mătase; UHMWPE (PE/Dyneema/Spectra); Altele
pt-BR: Tipo de fibra do fio para bordado com miçangas: Algodão; Elastano/Spandex (stretch); Kevlar/Aramida; Linho; Metálico; Nylon; Poliéster; Seda; UHMWPE (PE/Dyneema/Spectra); Outros
el: Τύπος ίνας νήματος για χάντρες: Βαμβάκι; Ελαστάνη/Spandex (ελαστικό); Κέβλαρ/Αραμίδιο; Λινό; Μεταλλικό; Νάιλον; Πολυεστέρας; Μετάξι; UHMWPE (PE/Dyneema/Spectra); Άλλο
zh-TW: 串珠線纖維類型: 棉; 彈性纖維/Spandex (彈力); Kevlar/芳綸; 亞麻; 金屬線; 尼龍; 聚酯纖維; 蠶絲; UHMWPE (PE/Dyneema/Spectra); 其他
nl: Rijggaren vezeltype: Katoen; Elastaan/spandex (stretch); Kevlar/aramide; Linnen; Metallic; Nylon; Polyester; Zijde; UHMWPE (PE/Dyneema/Spectra); Overige
th: ประเภทเส้นใยของด้ายลูกปัด: ฝ้าย; อีลาสเทน/สแปนเด็กซ์ (ยืดหยุ่น); เคฟลาร์/อะรามิด; ลินิน; เมทัลลิก; ไนลอน; โพลีเอสเตอร์; ไหม; UHMWPE (PE/Dyneema/Spectra); อื่นๆ
cs: Typ materiálu nitě na korálkování: Bavlna; Elastan/spandex (strečový); Kevlar/aramid; Len; Metalické; Nylon; Polyester; Hedvábí; UHMWPE (PE/Dyneema/Spectra); Jiné
tr: Boncuk ipliği lif tipi: Pamuk; Elastan/Spandeks (esnek); Kevlar/Aramid; Keten; Metalik; Naylon; Polyester; İpek; UHMWPE (PE/Dyneema/Spectra); Diğer
zh-CN: 串珠线纤维类型: 棉; 弹性纤维/氨纶（弹力）; 凯夫拉/芳纶; 亚麻; 金属; 尼龙; 聚酯纤维; 真丝; 超高分子量聚乙烯 (PE/Dyneema/Spectra); 其他
en: Beading thread fiber type: Cotton; Elastane/Spandex (stretch); Kevlar/Aramid; Linen; Metallic; Nylon; Polyester; Silk; UHMWPE (PE/Dyneema/Spectra); Other
pt-PT: Tipo de fibra do fio de missangas: Algodão; Elastano/spandex (elástico); Kevlar/aramida; Linho; Metálico; Nylon; Poliéster; Seda; UHMWPE (PE/Dyneema/Spectra); Outro
da: Fibertype for perletråd: Bomuld; Elastan/spandex (stræk); Kevlar/aramid; Linned; Metallisk; Nylon; Polyester; Silke; UHMWPE (PE/Dyneema/Spectra); Andet